Idaho, session 2025, S1187.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9706, Idaho Code, as added in Section 3 of
Senate Bill No. 1133, As Amended, if enacted by the First Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to
read as follows:
67-9706. REVIEW AND ACTION ON AGRICULTURAL PROTECTION AREA APPLICA-
TION. (1) Within sixty (60) days of receiving a recommendation from the agri-
cultural protection area commission to support or reject an application, the
board of county commissioners, or the planning and zoning administrator or
other administrative officer appointed by the board of county commission-
ers, shall approve or deny the application to include land in an agricultural
protection area in a written decision.
(2) The decision shall specify, at minimum:
(a) The ordinance and standards used in evaluating the application;
(b) The agricultural protection area commission's recommendation;
(c) A reasoned explanation for the decision reached by the administra-
tor or other administrative officer, if appointed; and
(d) If applicable, the actions, if any, that the applicant could take to
obtain approval.
(3) If the board of county commissioners, or the administrator or other
administrative officer, if appointed, fails to issue a written decision
within sixty (60) days of receiving a recommendation from the agricultural
protection area commission, the recommendation of the agricultural protec-
tion area commission shall become the decision of the board of county commis-
sioners or administrator or other administrative officer, if appointed.
(4)(a) An aggrieved applicant may appeal the decision of an administra-
tor or other administrative officer to the board of county commission-
ers within thirty (30) days of receiving the written decision pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section or recommendation that has become fi-
nal pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Within sixty (60) days of receiving an appeal, the board of county
commissioners shall hold a public hearing in accordance with the notice


and hearing procedures described in section 67-6509, Idaho Code, re-
garding the appeal.
(c) In reviewing an appeal, the board of county commissioners shall
consider the recommendation of the agricultural protection area com-
mission, the written decision of the administrator or other admin-
istrative officer, if appointed, all written and oral public comment
received at the public hearing, and any other information the board of
county commissioners determines to be relevant.
(d) Within sixty (60) days of the close of the public hearing, the
board of county commissioners shall issue a final decision approving
or denying the agricultural protection area application. If the board
of county commissioners fails to act within the sixty (60) day period,
the decision of the administrator or other administrative officer, if
appointed, shall become the final decision of the board of county com-
missioners.
(5) The board of county commissioners' final decision shall be subject
to judicial review.
(6) If the agricultural protection area application is approved, the
agricultural protection area shall be created.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-9709, Idaho Code, as amended in Section 4 of
Senate Bill No. 1133, As Amended, if enacted by the First Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to
read as follows:
67-9709. ADDING LAND TO AND REMOVING LAND FROM AN AGRICULTURAL PROTEC-
TION AREA. (1) A landowner may add land to an existing agricultural protec-
tion area by filing an application with the board of county commissioners.
The board of county commissioners shall review an application to add land to
an existing agricultural protection area shall be processed in accordance
with section 67-9706, Idaho Code.
(2) An owner of land within an agricultural protection area may remove
any or all of the land from the agricultural protection area by filing a peti-
tion for removal with the board of county commissioners.
(a) The board of county commissioners shall acknowledge receipt of the
petition for removal in writing; and
(b) Confirm the removal date as ten (10) years from the date of peti-
tion for removal, or upon expiration of the designation, whichever is
sooner.
(3) The board of county commissioners shall establish a process by
which an owner of land within an agricultural protection area may remove
any or all of the land from the agricultural protection area for reasons of
hardship, as defined in this chapter.
(4) The board of county commissioners may charge an administrative fee
not to exceed the cost of covering administrative expenses associated with
processing changes to an agricultural protection area, including but not
limited to updating the agricultural protection area map, recording docu-
ments, and reasonable staff time for processing the request. The clerk of
the board of county commissioners shall record the renewal of an agricul-
tural protection area pursuant to section 67-9708, Idaho Code.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.